Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5707YH (5) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2738 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.196 Iowa benefit exchange fund 1 ââ enhanced premium credits ââ appropriation. 2 1. As used in this section, âenhanced premium tax creditâ 3 means the advanced premium tax credit under 26 U.S.C. 4 Â§36B(3)(A). 5 2. The department and the department of insurance and 6 financial services shall cooperate and develop an internet 7 site to be located on the internet site of the department to 8 effectuate this section. 9 3. An Iowa benefit exchange fund is created in the state 10 treasury under the control of the department. Moneys in the 11 fund are to be used for the sole purpose of providing subsidies 12 to persons whose applications have been approved pursuant to 13 this section. Moneys in the fund are not subject to section 14 8.33. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 15 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 16 4. The purpose of the fund is to provide funding for the 17 establishment of a state-based health insurance subsidy to 18 mitigate the impact of the reduction in the enhanced federal 19 advanced premium tax credits after the 2025 tax year. 20 5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 21 June 30, 2027, there is appropriated from the general fund of 22 the state to the department to be credited to the Iowa benefit 23 exchange fund, an amount sufficient to implement this section 24 until such time that the enhanced federal advanced premium 25 tax credits are restored to a level equaling or exceeding the 26 amount of the enhanced premium tax credit available to persons 27 during the 2025 tax year. 28 6. Beginning July 1, 2026, in order to qualify for a subsidy 29 to mitigate the impact of the reduction in enhanced federal 30 advanced premium tax credits, a person who is a resident may 31 submit an application to the department in a manner specified 32 by the department. The application shall include identical 33 information submitted by a person as if applying for health 34 insurance coverage under the federal Patient Protection and 35 -1- LSB 5707YH (5) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2738 Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, including personal 1 information, household income, immigration status, and any 2 current or available health insurance coverage. 3 7. a. For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 4 2026, but before January 1, 2027, and upon approval of the 5 application by the department, an amount equal to the enhanced 6 premium tax credit the person would have received as if the 7 enhanced premium tax credit did not expire shall be provided to 8 the person to offset the cost of the health insurance coverage. 9 b. The amount provided shall be based upon the calculation 10 for the enhanced premium tax credits during the 2025 tax year. 11 c. The amount provided may be retroactive to January 1, 12 2026, if the person qualified for such credits, or to the 13 date the person would have qualified for enhanced premium tax 14 credits in 2026, whichever is earlier. 15 8. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 16 to administer this section. 17